Hawaii, session 2026, GM1111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that all political power
in the State is inherent in the people, and that the creation of
a corporation or other artificial legal entity is a privilege
granted by the State, not a natural right. Under article I,
section 21, of the Hawaii State Constitution, no grant of
special privileges or immunities is irrevocable and the
legislature retains full authority to redefine or withdraw any
corporate or entity powers that the State has conferred.
The legislature further finds that judicial decisions of
the United States Supreme Court recognize that the State
possesses plenary authority to determine the powers and
capacities of the artificial persons it creates. This Act
exercises that authority to restate and limit the powers that
the State grants to corporations, limited liability companies,
partnerships, associations, and other artificial persons.
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO
iiniiiiniiiiiiiiiiiiiHiii

Page 2
S.B. NO. --
C.D. 2
The legislature further finds that statutes in the State
and other jurisdictions have historically included broad grants
of corporate powers. State law currently authorizes a
corporation to have "the same powers as an individual to do all
things necessary or convenient to carry out its business and
affairs". The United States Supreme Court has interpreted these
broad grants of powers to include powers to make expenditures in
connection with elections and ballot measures, and has
recognized constitutional rights attached to the exercise of
these powers. The legislature declares that these political
spending powers were never intended to be among the powers
granted to corporations or other artificial persons by the
State. The aim of this Act is to make that intent explicit and
to define the lawful powers of artificial persons accordingly.
The legislature further finds that the federal prohibition
on 501(c) (3) nonprofit corporation electioneering has been
upheld in federal courts on the basis that those entities
receive the benefit of favorable tax settings. This principle
also applies to entities chartered in the State, which receive
the benefits of favorable tax settings and limited liability
protections under state law.
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO

Page 3
S.B. NO.
h.D.2
C.D. 2
The legislature believes that the powers conferred on an
artificial person are separate and distinct from the rights
retained by natural persons. This Act therefore does not
regulate any natural person's rights to speech, petition, or
association. This Act simply defines and limits the powers that
the State confers upon the artificial persons that the State
charters or authorizes to do business.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Reaffirm that artificial persons created under state
law possess only those powers that are necessary or
convenient to carry out lawful business and
organizational purposes, and that those powers do not
include the power to spend money or contribute
anything of value to influence elections or ballot
measures; and
(2) Establish penalties for violations.
SECTION 2. This Act applies to all entities organized
under the laws of this State unless expressly identified in
statute as a public body corporate and politic. Nothing in this
Act shall apply to any agency or instrumentality of the State or
its political subdivisions.
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 3

S.B. NO.
C.D.2
PART II
SECTION 3. Chapter 412, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part II of article 10, to be
appropriately designated and to read as follows:
"§412:10- Limitations on powers. A credit union
chartered under this part shall be subject to section 414-42
with respect to the limitations on corporate powers contained in
that section."
PART III
SECTION 4. Section 414-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding seven new definitions to be appropriately
inserted and to read as follows:
""Artificial-person powers" means the same powers as an
individual to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out
the corporation's lawful business and affairs, excluding any
power to directly or indirectly engage in election activity or
ballot-issue activity.
"Ballot-issue activity" means paying, contributing, or
expending money or anything of value to support or oppose a
constitutional amendment, county charter amendment, or other
ballot question after it has been formally certified or
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO

Page 5 S.B. NO.
^0'2
C.D. 2
submitted to the electors of the State or any county.
"Ballot-issue activity" does not include any bona fide news
story, commentary^ or editorial distributed through the
facilities of a broadcasting station or of any print, online, or
digital newspaper, magazine, blog, or other periodical
publication, unless the broadcasting, print, online, or digital
facility is owned or controlled by a candidate, political
committee, or political party.
"Candidate" and "candidate committee" have the same
meanings as defined in section 11-302.
"Charter privilege" means any benefit that exists only
because the State confers it on a corporation or other entity,
including, without limitation, limited liability, perpetual
duration, succession in the corporate name, business or
statutory trusts, and tax credits or abatements.
"Election activity" means paying, contributing, or
expending money or anything of value to support or oppose a
candidate, political committee, or political party. "Election
activity" does not include any bona fide news story, commentary,
or editorial distributed through the facilities of a
broadcasting station or of any print, online, or digital
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO
■■■iHBiHinim

Page 6 2471
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 2
newspaper, magazine^ blog, or other periodical publication^
unless the broadcasting, print, online, or digital facility is
owned or controlled by a candidate, political committee, or
political party.
"Political committee" means any person, group of persons,
association, organization, or other entity, other than a
candidate or candidate committee, established and maintained by
a party that receives contributions or makes expenditures for
the purpose of influencing the nomination, election, or defeat
of a candidate, or the passage or defeat of a ballot measure.
"Political party" has the same meaning as "party" as
defined in section 11-302."
SECTION 5. Section 414-41, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) Every corporation incorporated under this chapter has
the purpose of engaging in any lawful business, not including
election activity or ballot-issue activity, unless a more
limited purpose is set forth in the articles of incorporation.
Under no circumstances shall any power or activity related to
election activity or ballot-issue activity be deemed necessary
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO

Page 7 2471
S.B. NO.
S.D.2
H.D.2
C.D.2
or conyenient for a cor£or^^tion2 s lawfu3^^uBdmess 2ur£ose or
affairs."
SECTION 6. Section 414-42, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"[•{•]§414-42 [^] General powers. (a) The creation and
continued existence of a corporation shall not be deemed a right
but shall be a conditional grant of legal status by this State
and shall remain subject to complete withdrawal at any time.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2027, a corporation operating under
the jurisdiction of this State shall not have the power to
expend moneys on or participate in any election activity or
ballot-issue activity. Under no circumstances shall any
election activity or ballot-issue activity be deemed necessary
or convenient for a corporation's lawful purpose or affairs.
Unless its articles of incorporation provide
otherwise, every corporation [fees] shall have perpetual duration
and succession in its corporate name and [has tho oamo powers ao
an--individual to do--all things necessary or oonvonient-to-carry
eut—its—bueifiess—aftd—af^airrsT-] shall have artificial-person
powers, including_j_ without limitation, the power [-7-] to:
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO

Page 8
S.B. NO.
3^'2
C.D. 2
(1) [¥e—9-ue] Sue and be sued, complain_^ and defend in its
corporate name;
(2) [¥e—have] Have a corporate seal, which may be altered
at will, and [te] use it, or a facsimile of it, by
impressing or affixing it or in any other manner
reproducing it;
(3) [¥©—make] Make and amend bylaws, not inconsistent with
its articles of incorporation or with the laws of this
State, for managing the business and regulating the
affairs of the corporation;
(4) [TO' purcha-eeT-] Purchase, receive, lease, or otherwise
acquire, and own, hold, improve, use, and otherwise
deal with, real or personal property, or any legal or
equitable interest in property, wherever located;
(5) t?e—aaHrr] Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease,
exchange, and otherwise dispose of all or any part of
its property;
(6) [To purchaqc,] Purchase, receive, subscribe for, or
otherwise acquire; own, hold, vote, use, sell,
mortgage, lend, pledge, or otherwise dispose of; and
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 8
liiiiiniininiiiinnwi

Page 9 2471
S.B. NO
S.D. 2
H.D.2
C.D. 2
deal in and with shares or other interests in, or
obligations of, any other entity;
(7) Make contracts and guarantees, incur
liabilities, borrow money, issue its notes, bonds, and
other obligations (which may be convertible into or
include the option to purchase other securities of the
corporation), and secure any of its obligations by
mortgage or pledge of any of its property, franchises,
or income;
(8) [¥e—Ireftd] Lend money, invest and reinvest its funds,
and receive and hold real and personal property as
security for repayment;
(9) [?P©—fee] Be a promoter, partner, member, associate, or
manager of any partnership, joint venture, trust, or
other entity;
(10) [To conduct] Conduct its business, locate offices, and
exercise the powers granted by this chapter within or
without this State;
(11) [¥e—eieefe] Elect directors and appoint officers,
employees, and agents of the corporation, define their
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO

Page 10
S.B. NO.
^’2
C.D. 2
duties, fix their compensation, and lend them money
and credit;
(12) [5^e—pay] Pay pensions and establish pension plans,
pension trusts, profit sharing plans, share bonus
plans, share option plans, and benefit or incentive
plans for any or all of its current or former
directors, officers, employees, and agents;
(13) [¥©-«ake] Make donations for the public welfare or for
charitable, scientific, or educational purposes;
(14) [To tranoact] Transact any lawful business that will
aid governmental policy; and
(15) [To make] Make payments [er—denatiefts-] , or do any
other act, not inconsistent with law, that furthers
the business and affairs of the corporation.
(d) Any provision of the articles of incorporation,
bylaws, or other organizational documents of the corporation
purporting to grant or confer any power to directly or
indirectly engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity
shall be void.
(e) Any act undertaken by a corporation that constitutes
an election activity or ballot-issue activity shall be ultra
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 1

Page 11
S.B. NO. "
C.D. 2
vires and void. A corporation that exercises any power in
violation of this subsection may be subject to any applicable
sanctions or penalties pursuant to section A-1.
(f) A foreign corporation shall have no greater rights or
privileges than, and shall be subject to the same duties,
restrictions, penalties, and liabilities as, a domestic
corporation as provided in section 414-435. A foreign
corporation that is authorized to transact business, is
otherwise transacting business, or holds property in the State
shall be subject to this section. A foreign corporation that
directly or indirectly undertakes, finances, or directs election
activity or ballot-issue activity in the State shall be
conclusively deemed to be transacting business in the State and
shall be subject to any applicable penalties or sanctions. If a
final judgment, no longer subject to appeal, by a court of
competent jurisdiction limits, invalidates, or enjoins the
operation of this subsection, in whole or in part, in any
respect, including as applied to any person, entity, or
circumstance, or renders this subsection as having no legal
effect, in whole or in part, in any respect, including as
applied to any person, entity, or circumstance, as of the entry
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 1
iiiiiiimunimiiniiiiiii

Page 12 S.B. NO.
3^’2
C.D. 2
of such judgment, then the entirety of Act, Session Laws of
Hawaii 2026, shall be deemed invalid and have no force or
effect."
SECTION 7. Section 414-44, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"[-[•]§414-44 [-]-] Ultra vires. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (b), the validity of corporate action may not be
challenged on the ground that the corporation lacks or lacked
power to act.
(b) A corporation's power to act may be challenged[+] in a
proceeding by;
(1) [In-Q procGoding by a] A shareholder against the
corporation to enjoin the act;
(2) [In a prococding by t-he] The corporation, directly,
derivatively, or through a receiver, trustee, or other
legal representative, against an incumbent or former
director, officer, employee, or agent of the
corporation; or
(3) [In—a-proeoeding by the] The attorney general under
section 414-411.
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 12

S.B. NO. ^’2
H.D. 2
C.D. 2
(c) In a shareholder's proceeding under subsection (b) (1)
to enjoin an unauthorized corporate act, the court may enjoin or
set aside the act, if equitable and if all affected persons are
parties to the proceeding, and may award damages for loss (other
than anticipated profits) suffered by the corporation or another
party because of enjoining the unauthorized act.
(d) This section shall not apply to acts that constitute
election activities or ballot-issue activities, which are ultra
vires and void pursuant to section 414-42 (e)."
PART IV
SECTION 8. Section 414D-14, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding seven new definitions to be appropriately
inserted and to read as follows:
""Artificial-person powers" means the same powers as an
individual to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out
the corporation's lawful purposes and activities, excluding any
power to directly or indirectly engage in election activity or
ballot-issue activity.
"Ballot-issue activity" means paying, contributing, or
expending money or anything of value to support or oppose a
constitutional amendment, county charter amendment, or other
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 1

Page 14
S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
ballot question after it has been formally certified or
submitted to the electors of the State or any county.
"Ballot-issue activity" does not include any bona fide news
story, commentary, or editorial distributed through the
facilities of a broadcasting station or of any print, online, or
digital newspaper, magazine, blog, or other periodical
publication, unless the broadcasting, print, online, or digital
facility is owned or controlled by a candidate, political
committee, or political party.
"Candidate" and "candidate committee" have the same
meanings as defined in section 11-302. '
"Charter privilege" means any benefit that exists only
because the State confers it on a corporation or other entity,
including, without limitation, limited liability, perpetual
duration, succession in the corporate name, business or
statutory trusts, and tax credits or abatements.
"Election activity" means paying, contributing, or
expending money or anything of value to support or oppose a
candidate, political committee, or political party. "Election
activity" does not include any bona fide news story, commentary,
or editorial distributed through the facilities of a
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 14
■mMHiiniiii

Page 15
S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
broadcasting station or of any print, online^ or digital
newspaper, magazine, blog, or other periodical publication,
unless the broadcasting, print, online, or digital facility is
owned or controlled by a candidate, political committee, or
political party.
"Political committee" means any person, group of persons,
association, organization, or other entity, other than a
candidate or candidate committee, established and maintained by
a party that receives contributions or makes expenditures for
the purpose of influencing the nomination, election, or defeat
of a candidate, or the passage or defeat of a ballot measure.
"Political party" has the same meaning as "party" as
defined in section 11-302."
SECTION 9. Section 414D-51, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
" (a) Every corporation incorporated under this chapter has
the purpose of engaging in any lawful activity, not including
election activity or ballot-issue activity, unless a more
limited purpose is set forth in the articles of incorporation.
Under no circumstances shall any power or activity related to
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 15

Page 16
S.B. NO. ^’2
C.D. 2
election activity or ballot-issue activity be deemed necessary
or convenient for a corporation's lawful business or affairs."
SECTION 10. Section 414D-52, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"[-[■] §414D-52 [-3-] General powers. (a) The creation and
continued existence of a corporation shall not be deemed a right
but shall be a conditional grant of legal status by this State
and shall remain subject to complete withdrawal at any time.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2027, a corporation operating under
the jurisdiction of this State shall not have the power to
expend moneys on or participate in any election activity or
ballot-issue activity. Under no circumstances shall any
election activity or ballot-issue activity be deemed necessary
or convenient for a corporation's lawful purpose or affairs.
(c) Unless its articles of incorporation provide
otherwise, every corporation [hae] shall have perpetual duration
and succession in its corporate name and [has the-samo powers■■oc
an- -indivi-dual- to do all thi-ng-s—nceeosa-r-y or convenient to carry
out its affairs] shall have artificial-person powers, including,
without limitation, the power [-f-] to:
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 16

Page 17
S.B. NO. --
C.D. 2
(1) [To duo] Si^ and be sued, complain, and defend in its
corporate name;
(2) [¥e-4iave] Haye a corporate seal, which may be altered
at will, and [•fee] use it, or a facsimile of it, by
impressing or affixing or in any other manner
reproducing it;
(3) [¥e—ffta4€e] Make and amend bylaws, not inconsistent with
its articles of incorporation or with the laws of the
State, for regulating and managing the affairs of the
corporation;
(4) [To purohaoG,] Purchase, receive, lease, or otherwise
acquire, and own, hold, improve, use, and otherwise
deal with, real or personal property, or any legal or
equitable interest in property, wherever located;
(5) [Te—eeilrr] Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease,
exchange, and otherwise dispose of all or any part of
its property;
(6) [To purchase,] Purchase, receive, subscribe for, or
otherwise acquire, own, hold, vote, use, sell,
mortgage, lend, pledge, or otherwise dispose of, and
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 17

Page 18
S.B. NO. s"-
C.D. 2
deal in and with, shares or other interests in, or
obligations of2_ any entity;
(7) [¥©-^ftake] Make contracts and guaranties, incur
liabilities, borrow money, issue notes, bonds, and
other obligations, and secure any of its obligations
by mortgage or pledge of any of its property,
franchises, or income;
(8) [To lend] Len^ money, invest and reinvest its funds,
and receive and hold real and personal property as
security for repayment, except as limited by section
414D-151;
(9) [4Pe-^e] Be a promoter, partner, member, associate, or
manager of any partnership, joint venture, trust, or
other entity;
(10) [To conduct] Conduct its activities, locate offices,
and exercise the powers granted by this chapter within
or without this State;
(11) [¥e—eieet] Elect or appoint directors, officers,
employees, and agents of the corporation, define their
duties, and fix their compensation;
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 18

Page 19
S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
(12) [To pay] pensions and establish pension plans,
pension trusts, and other benefit and incentive plans
for any or all of its current or former directors,
officers, employees, and agents;
(13) [To—malte] Maice donations not inconsistent with law for
the public welfare or for charitable, religious,
scientific, or educational purposes, and for other
purposes that further the corporate interest;
(14) [TO"impose] Impose dues, assessments, admission, and
transfer fees upon its members;
(15) [To ostablioh] Establish conditions for admission of
members, admit members, and issue memberships;
(16) [To -oar-r-y] Ca^^ on a business; ar^
(17) [T©—d©] Do all things necessary or convenient, not
inconsistent with law, to further the activities and
affairs of the corporation.
(d) Any provision of the articles, bylaws, or other
organizational documents of the corporation purporting to grant
or confer any power to directly or indirectly engage in election
activity or ballot-issue activity shall be void.
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 19

Page 20
S.B. NO. ^2
H.D.2
C.D.2
(e) A foreign corporation shall have no greater rights or
privileges than, and shall be subject to the same duties,
restrictions, penalties, and liabilities as, a domestic
corporation as provided in section 414D-275. A foreign
corporation that is authorized to transact business, is
otherwise transacting business, or holds property in the State
shall be subject to this section. A foreign corporation that
directly or indirectly undertakes, finances, or directs election
activity or ballot-issue activity in the State shall be
conclusively deemed to be transacting business in the State and
shall be subject to any applicable penalties or sanctions. If a
final judgment, no longer subject to appeal, by a court of
competent jurisdiction limits, invalidates, or enjoins the
operation of this subsection, in whole or in part, in any
respect, including as applied to any person, entity, or
circumstance, or renders this subsection as having no legal
effect, in whole or in part, in any respect, including as
applied to any person, entity, or circumstance, as of the entry
of such judgment, then the entirety of Act, Session Laws of
Hawaii 2026, shall be deemed invalid and have no force or
effect.
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 20

Page 21
S B. NO. --
H.D. 2
C.D. 2
(f) Any act undertaken by a corporation that constitutes
an election activity or ballot-issue activity shall be ultra
vires and void. A corporation that exercises any power in
violation of this subsection may be subject to any applicable
sanctions or penalties pursuant to section A-1.
(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or
chapter^ candidate committees and noncandidate committees, as
defined in section 11-302, or similar committees created under
federal law, are entities created for the purpose of engaging in
election activity and ballot-issue activity and are hereby
granted the power to engage in those activities; provided that
the committees exist solely for those purposes and claim no
charter privilege other than limited liability. No other
corporation organized under this chapter shall be granted or
shall exercise any power to engage in election activity or
ballot-issue activity."
SECTION 11. Section 414D-54, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§414D-54 Ultra vires. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (b), the validity of corporate action may not be
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 21

Page 22
S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
challenged on the ground that the corporation lacks or lacked
power to act.
(b) A corporation's power to act may be challenged in a
proceeding against the corporation to enjoin an act where a
third party has not acquired rights. The proceeding may be
brought by the attorney general, a director, or by a member or
members in a derivative proceeding.
(c) A corporation's power to act may be challenged in a
proceeding against an incumbent or former director, officer,
employee, or agent of the corporation. The proceeding may be
brought by a director, the corporation, directly, derivatively,
or through a receiver, a trustee, or other legal representative,
or in the case of a public benefit corporation, by the attorney
general.
(d) This section shall not apply to acts that constitute
election activities or ballot-issue activities, which are ultra
vires and void pursuant to section 414D-52(f), except as
provided in section 414D-52(g)."
PART V
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 22

Page 23
S.B. NO.
3-2
H.D. 2
C.D. 2
SECTION 12. Chapter 415A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§415A- Limitations on powers. A professional
corporation organized under this chapter shall be subject to
section 414-42, including all limitations on corporate powers
contained in that section."
PART VI
SECTION 13. Chapter 421, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§421- Limitations on powers. An association organized
under this chapter shall be subject to section 414-42, including
all limitations on corporate powers contained in that section."
PART VII
SECTION 14. Chapter 42IC, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§421C- Limitations on powers. An association organized
under this chapter shall be subject to section 414-42, including
all limitations on corporate powers contained in that section."
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 2

Page 24
S.B. NO. --
H.D.2
C.D.2
PART VIII
SECTION 15. Chapter 421H, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§421H- Limitations on powers. A limited-equity housing
cooperative organized under this chapter shall be subject to
section 414D-52, including all limitations on corporate powers
contained in that section."
PART IX
SECTION 16. Chapter 425, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to the "Limited Liability
Partnerships" subpart of part IV to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§425- Election activity and ballot-issue activity;
limitation on limited lietbility privilege. (a) This section
shall apply only to partnerships registered as limited liability
partnerships under this subpart.
(b) A partnership registered as a limited liability
partnership under this subpart shall not directly or indirectly
engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity.
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 24

Page 25
S.B. NO. --
C.D. 2
(c) Any act undertaken by a limited liability partnership
that constitutes an election activity or ballot-issue activity
shall be ultra vires and void. A limited liability partnership
that exercises any power in violation of this subsection may be
subject to any applicable sanctions or penalties pursuant to
section A-1.
(d) A foreign limited liability partnership shall have no
greater rights or privileges than, and shall be subject to the
same duties, restrictions, penalties, and liabilities as, a
domestic limited liability partnership as provided in section
425-3. A foreign limited liability partnership that is
authorized to transact business, is otherwise transacting
business, or holds property in the State shall be subject to
this section. A foreign limited liability partnership that
directly or indirectly undertakes, finances, or directs election
activity or ballot-issue activity in the State shall be
conclusively deemed to be transacting business in the State and
shall be subject to any applicable penalties or sanctions. If a
final judgment, no longer subject to appeal, by a court of
competent jurisdiction limits, invalidates, or enjoins the
operation of this subsection, in whole or in part, in any
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 25

Page 26 2471
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 2
respect, Including as applied to any person^ entity^ or
circumstance, or renders this subsection as having no legal
effect, in whole or in part, in any respect, including as
applied to any person, entity, or circumstance, as of the entry
of such judgment, then the entirety of Act, Session Laws of
Hawaii 2026, shall be deemed invalid and have no force or
effect.
(e) For the purposes of this section;
"Ballot-issue activity" has the same meaning as defined in
section 414-3.
"Election activity" has the same meaning as defined in
section 414-3."
PART X
SECTION 17. Chapter 425E-102, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding seven new definitions to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
""Artificial-person powers" means the same powers as an
individual to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out
the limited partnership's lawful business and affairs, excluding
any power to directly or indirectly engage in election activity
or ballot-issue activity.
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 26

Page 27
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 2
"Ballot-issue activity" means paying, contributing, or
expending money or anything of value to support or oppose a
constitutional amendment, county charter amendment, or other
ballot question after it has been formally certified or
submitted to the electors of the State or any county.
"Ballot-issue activity" does not include any bona fide news
story, commentary, or editorial distributed through the
facilities of a broadcasting station or of any print, online, or
digital newspaper, magazine, blog, or other periodical
publication, unless the broadcasting, print, online, or digital
facility is owned or controlled by a candidate, political
committee, or political party.
"Candidate" and "candidate committee" have the same
meanings as defined in section 11-302.
"Charter privilege" means any benefit that exists only
because the State confers it on a limited partnership or other
entity, including, without limitation, limited liability.
perpetual duration, succession in its name, business or
statutory trusts, and tax credits or abatements.
"Election activity" means paying, contributing, or
expending money or anything of value to support or oppose a
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 27

Page 28
S.B. NO.
H.D.2
C.D. 2
candidate^ political committee, or political party. "Election
activity" does not include any bona fide news story, commentary,
or editorial distributed through the facilities of a
broadcasting station or of any print, online, or digital
newspaper, magazine, blog, or other periodical publication,
unless the broadcasting, print, online, or digital facility is
owned or controlled by a candidate, political committee, or
political party.
"Political committee" means any person, group of persons,
association, organization, or other entity, other than a
candidate or candidate committee, established and maintained by
a party that receives contributions or makes expenditures for
the purpose of influencing the nomination, election, or defeat
of a candidate, or the passage or defeat of a ballot measure.
"Political party" has the same meaning as "party" as
defined in section 11-302."
SECTION 18. Section 425E-105, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"[-£•]§425E-105 [•}•] Powers. [A limitod-pa-r-tnership -has the
powers to do all- fehi-ngo neee-s&a-ry or convoniont to carry on its
activities/—ifteiudiag-^febe—pewer^-te—sueT-^ae—saedv—and defend in
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 28

Page 29
S.B. NO.
-’2
H.D. 2
C.D. 2
i-t-a ewfi—name and to aft—action agaiftet-a partner for
harm caused t-e—the-limi--tcd partnerohip by a—broach—of the
partnership agreement or violation of a duty to the
partnerohip.] (a) The creation and continued existence of a
limited partnership shall not be deemed a right but shall be a
conditional grant of legal status by this State and shall remain
subject to complete withdrawal at any time.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2Q27y a limited partnership
operating under the jurisdiction of this State shall not have
the power to expend moneys on or participate in any election
activity or ballot-issue activity. Under no circumstances shall
any power or activity related to election activity or ballot­
issue activity be deemed necessary or convenient for a limited
partnership's lawful business or affairs.
(c) A limited partnership shall have perpetual duration
and succession in its name. Unless its partnership agreement or
certificate of limited partnership provides otherwise, each
limited partnership shall have artificial-person powers together
with the powers enumerated in this chapter.
(d) Any provision of a partnership agreement, certificate
of limited partnership, or other organizational document
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 2
■iiiiHimiiinii

Page 30
S.B. NO.
C.D.2
purporting to grant or confer any power to directly or
indirectly engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity
shall be void.
(e) Any act undertaken by a limited partnership that
constitutes an election activity or ballot-issue activity shall
be ultra vires and void. A limited partnership that exercises
any power in violation of this subsection may be subject to any
applicable sanctions or penalties pursuant to section A-1.
(f) A foreign limited partnership shall have no greater
rights or privileges than, and shall be subject to the same
duties, restrictions, penalties, and liabilities as, a domestic
limited partnership as provided in section 425E-901. A foreign
limited partnership that is authorized to transact business, is
otherwise transacting business, or holds property in the State
shall be subject to this section. A foreign limited partnership
that directly or indirectly undertakes, finances, or directs
election activity or ballot-issue activity in the State shall be
conclusively deemed to be transacting business in the State and
shall be subject to any applicable penalties or sanctions. If a
final judgment, no longer subject to appeal, by a court of
competent jurisdiction limits, invalidates, or enjoins the
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 30

Page 31
S.B. NO.
V H.D. 2
C.D. 2
operation of this subsection, in whole or in part, in any
respect, including as applied to any person, entity, or
circumstance, or renders this subsection as having no legal
effect, in whole or in part, in any respect, including as
applied to any person, entity, or circumstance, as of the entry
of such judgment, then the entirety of Act, Session Laws of
Hawaii 2026, shall be deemed invalid and have no force or
effect."
PART XI
SECTION 19. Section 428-101, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding seven new definitions to be appropriately
inserted and to read as follows:
""Artificial-person powers” means the same powers as an
individual to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out
the limited liability company's lawful business and affairs,
excluding any power to directly or indirectly engage in election
activity or ballot-issue activity.
"Ballot-issue activity" means paying, contributing, or
expending money or anything of value to support or oppose a
constitutional amendment, county charter amendment, or other
ballot question after it has been formally certified or
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 31
Hiiiiiiiininniinniniin

Page 32
S.B. NO.
C.D. 2
submitted to the electors of the State or any county.
"Ballot-issue activity" does not include any bona fide news
story^ commentary, or editorial distributed through the
facilities of a broadcasting station or of any print, online, or
digital newspaper, magazine, blog, or other periodical
publication, unless the broadcasting, print, online, or digital
facility is owned or controlled by a candidate, political
committee, or political party.
"Candidate" and "candidate committee" have the same
meanings as defined in section 11-302.
"Charter privilege" means any benefit that exists only
because the State confers it on a limited liability company or
other entity, including, without limitation, limited liability,
perpetual duration, succession in its name, business or
statutory trusts, and tax credits or abatements.
"Election activity" means paying, contributing, or
expending money or anything of value to support or oppose a
candidate, political committee, or political party. "Election
activity" does not include any bona fide news story, commentary,
or editorial distributed through the facilities of a
broadcasting station or of any print, online, or digital
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 32

Page 33
S.B. NO.
H.D.2
C.D. 2
newspaper, magazine, blog, or other periodical publication^
unless the broadcasting, print, online, or digital facility is
owned or controlled by a candidate, political committee, or
political party.
"Political committee” means any person, group of persons,
association, organization, or other entity, other than a
candidate or candidate committee, established and maintained by
a party that receives contributions or makes expenditures for
the purpose of influencing the nomination, election, or defeat
of a candidate, or the passage or defeat of a ballot measure.
"Political party" has the same meaning as "party" as
defined in section 11-302."
SECTION 20. Section 428-111, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§428-111 Nature of business and powers. [-(-al-- A limited
l-i-ab44-ity company may be organized-under-thio chapter for any
lawful purpooe,—subject fee—any .taw—of thio State-■■govor-n-i-ng- or
regulating buoineoo.-
-ffet] (a) The creation and continued existence of a limited
liability company shall not be deemed a right but shall be a
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 33

Page 34
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 2
conditional grant of legal status by this State and shall remain
subject'to complete withdrawal at any time.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2027/ a limited liability company
operating under the jurisdiction of this State shall not have
the power to expend moneys on or participate in any election
activity or ballot-issue activity. Under no circumstances shall
any power or activity related to election activity or ballot­
issue activity be deemed necessary or convenient for a limited
liability company's lawful business or affairs.
(c) Unless its articles of organization provide otherwise,
a limited liability company [has the oamc pewora as—aft
individual to do all things nocGsoary or convcniont—t-o carry on
its buoincos-or affairs/] shall have perpetual duration and
succession in its company name and artificial-person powers,
including the power to:
(1) Sue and be sued, and defend in its company name;
(2) Purchase, receive, lease, or otherwise acquire, and
own, hold, improve, use, and otherwise deal with real
or personal property, or any legal or equitable
interest in property, wherever located;
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 34

Page 35
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 2
(3) Sell, convey, mortgage, grant a security interest in,
lease, exchange, and otherwise encumber or dispose of
all or any part of its property;
(4) Purchase, receive, subscribe for, or otherwise
acquire, own, hold, vote, use, sell, mortgage, lend,
grant a security interest in, or otherwise dispose of
and deal in and with, shares or other interests in or
obligations of any other entity;
(5) Make contracts and guarantees, incur liabilities,
borrow money, issue notes, bonds, and other
obligations, which may be convertible into or include
the option to purchase other securities of the limited
liability company, and secure any of its obligations
by a mortgage on or a security interest in any of its
property, franchises, or income;
(6) Lend money, invest and reinvest its funds, and receive
and hold real and personal property as security for
repayment;
(7) Be a promoter, partner, member, associate, or manager
of any partnership, joint venture, trust, or other
entity;
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 3

Page 36
S.B. NO. "2
H.D.2
C.D. 2
(8) Conduct its business, locate offices, and exercise the
powers granted by this chapter within or without this
State;
(9) Elect managers and appoint officers, employees, and
agents of the limited liability company, define their
duties, fix their compensation, and lend them money
and credit;
(10) Pay pensions and establish pension plans, pension
trusts, profit sharing plans, share bonus plans, share
option plans, and benefit or incentive plans for any
or all of its current or former members, managers,
officers, employees, and agents;
(11) Make donations for the public welfare or for
charitable, scientific, or educational purposes; and
(12) Make payments [or donationo], or do any other act, not
inconsistent with law, that furthers the business of
the limited liability company.
(d) Any provision of an articles of organization or other
organizational document purporting to grant or confer any power
to directly or indirectly engage in election activity or
ballot-issue activity shall be void.
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 3

Page 37 2471
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D.2
(e) Any act undertaken by a limited liability company that
constitutes an election activity or ballot-issue activity shall
be ultra vires and void. A limited liability company that
exercises any power in violation of this subsection may be
subject to any applicable sanctions or penalties pursuant to
section B-1.
(£) A foreign limited liability company shall have no
greater rights or privileges than^ and shall be subject to the
same duties, restrictions, penalties, and liabilities as, a
domestic limited liability company as provided in section
428-1001. A foreign limited liability company that is
authorized to transact business, is otherwise transacting
business, or holds property in the State shall be subject to
this section. A foreign limited liability company that directly
or indirectly undertakes, finances, or directs election activity
or ballot-issue activity in the State shall be conclusively
deemed to be transacting business in the State and shall be
subject to any applicable penalties or sanctions. If a final
judgment, no longer subject to appeal, by a court of competent
jurisdiction limits, invalidates, or enjoins the operation of
this subsection, in whole or in part, in any respect, including
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 37

Page 38
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 2
as applied to any person^ entity^ or circumstance^ or renders
this subsection as having no legal effect, in whole or in part,
in any respect, including as applied to any person, entity, or
circumstance, as of the entry of such judgment, then the
entirety of Act, Session Laws of Hawaii 2026, shall be
deemed invalid and have no force or effect.”
PART XII
SECTION 21. Chapter 429, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§429- Powers of nongrofit association£^ (a) The
creation and continued existence of a nonprofit association
shall not be deemed a right but shall be a conditional grant of
legal status by this State and shall remain subject to complete
withdrawal at any time.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2027, a nonprofit association
operating under the jurisdiction of this State shall not have
the power to expend moneys on or participate in any election
activity or ballot-issue activity. Under no circumstances shall
any election activity or ballot-issue activity be deemed
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 38
MniHiiiiiiinnimiiii

Page 39 2471
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 2
necessary or convenient for a nonprofit association's lawful
purpose or affairs.
(c) Unless its governing principles provide otherwise,
each nonprofit association shall have artificial-person powers,
together with the powers enumerated in this chapter.
(d) Any provision of the nonprofit association's governing
principles, articles of association, bylaws, or similar
documents purporting to grant or confer any power to directly or
Indirectly engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity
shall be void.
(e) Any act undertaken by a nonprofit association that
constitutes an election activity or ballot-issue activity shall
be ultra vires and void. A nonprofit association that exercises
any power in violation of this subsection may be subject to any
applicable sanctions or penalties pursuant to section B-1.
(f) A foreign nonprofit association shall have no greater
rights or privileges than, and shall be subject to the same
duties, restrictions, penalties, and liabilities as, a domestic
nonprofit association as provided in this section. A foreign
nonprofit association that is authorized to transact business,
is otherwise transacting business, or holds property in the
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 39
iiiiiiiiiniiiniiii

Page 40
S.B. NO. ^’2
C.D. 2
State shall be subject to this section. A foreign nonprofit
association that directly or indirectly undertakes, finances^ or
directs election activity or ballot-issue activity in the State
shall be conclusively deemed to be transacting business in the
State and shall be subject to any applicable penalties or
sanctions as provided in subsection (e). If a final judgment,
no longer subject to appeal, by a court of competent
jurisdiction limits, invalidates, or enjoins the operation of
this subsection, in whole or in part, in any respect, including
as applied to any person, entity, or circumstance, or renders
this subsection as having no legal effect, in whole or in part,
in any respect, including as applied to any person, entity, or
circumstance, as of the entry of such judgment, then the
ent iret y of Act, Session Laws of Hawaii 2026, shall be
deemed invalid and have no force or effect."
SECTION 22. Section 429-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding seven new definitions to be appropriately
inserted and to read as follows:
""Artificial-person powers" means the same powers as an
individual to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out
the nonprofit association's lawful purposes and activities.
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 40

Page 41
S.B. NO. --
C.D. 2
excluding any power to directly or indirectly engage in election
activity or ballot-issue activity.
"Ballot-issue activity” means paying, contributing, or
expending money or anything of value to support or oppose a
constitutional amendment, county charter amendment, or other
ballot question after it has been formally certified or
submitted to the electors of the State or any county.
"Ballot-issue activity" does not include any bona fide news
story, commentary, or editorial distributed through the
facilities of a broadcasting station or of any print, online, or
digital newspaper, magazine, blog, or other periodical
publication, unless the broadcasting, print, online, or digital
facility is owned or controlled by a candidate, political
committee, or political party.
"Candidate" and "candidate committee" have the same
meanings as in section 11-302.
"Charter privilege" means any benefit that exists only
because the State confers it on a nonprofit association or other
entity, including, without limitation, limited liability,
perpetual duration, succession in its name, business or
statutory trusts, and tax credits or abatements.
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 41
liiiiiiiiiiBiHiiiiiniiii

Page 42 2471
S.B. NO
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D, 2
"Election activity” means paying^ contributing, or
expending money or anything of value to support or oppose a
candidate, political committee, or political party. "Election
activity" does not include any bona fide news story, commentary,
or editorial distributed through the facilities of a
broadcasting station or of any print, online, or digital
newspaper, magazine, blog, or other periodical publication,
unless the broadcasting, print, online, or digital facility is
owned or controlled by a candidate, political committee, or
political party.
"Political committee" means any person, group of persons,
association, organization, or other entity, other than a
candidate or candidate committee, established and maintained by
a party that receives contributions or makes expenditures for
the purpose of influencing the nomination, election, or defeat
of a candidate, or the passage or defeat of a ballot measure.
"Political party" has the same meaning as "party" as
defined in section 11-302."
PART XIII
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 42

Page 43
S.B. NO.
"'2
H.D.2
C.D. 2
SECTION 23. The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by
adding a new chapter to title 23 to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"CHAPTER A
ENFORCEMENT OF ARTIFICIAL PERSON POWERS LIMITATIONS
§A-1 Enforcement; penalties. The attorney general or the
director of commerce and consumer affairs may impose penalties
or bring an action, as applicable, for an ultra vires act by an
entity organized or authorized to transact business pursuant to
title 23 as follows:
(1) Temporary suspension of the entity's authority to
operate in the State, transact business in the State,
or otherwise exercise its lawful purposes in the
State;
(2) Prohibition of the entity from entering into or
continuing in a state public procurement contract
pursuant to chapter 103D;
(3) Revocation of the entity's state tax exempt status, as
applicable;
(4) Designation of the entity as a non-compliant entity or
requirement of additional reporting;
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 43
inniiiiiiiiniiuiiiiiiiiiii

Page 44
S.B. NO. --
C.D. 2
(5) Revocation of the entity's charter, certificate, or
other instrument authorizing the entity to operate in
the State, transact business in the State, or
otherwise exercise its lawful purposes in the State;
and
(6) Involuntary dissolution of the entity in the State."
SECTION 24, The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by
adding a new chapter to title 23A to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"CHAPTER B
ENFORCEMENT OF ARTIFICIAL PERSON POWERS LIMITATIONS
§B-1 Enforcement; penalties. The attorney general or the
director of commerce and consumer affairs may impose penalties
or bring an action, as applicable, for an ultra vires act by an
entity organized or authorized to transact business pursuant to
title 23A as follows:
(1) Temporary suspension of the entity's authority to
operate in the State, transact business in the State,
or otherwise exercise its lawful purposes in the
State;
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 44
iiiHgiiiiwngiBM

Page 45 2471
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 2
(2) Prohibition of the entity from entering into or
continuing in a state public procurement contract
pursuant to chapter 103D;
(3) Revocation of the entity’s state tax exempt status, as
applicable;
(4) Designation of the entity as a non-compliant entity or
requirement of additional reporting;
(5) Revocation of the entity's charter, certificate, or
other instrument authorizing the entity to operate in
the State, transact business in the State, or
otherwise exercise its lawful purposes in the State;
and
(6) Involuntary dissolution of the entity in the State."
PART XIV
SECTION 25. (a) If any provision of this Act, or its
application to any person or circumstance, is held invalid or
unconstitutional, the remaining provisions and applications that
are severable shall remain in effect.
(b) A power, privilege, or capacity that this Act does not
confer, recognize, or extend or that this Act withdraws or
clarifies to be outside the powers of an artificial person may
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 45
iiinimniliiHiiiiiii

Page 46 2471
S.B. NO
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 2
not be reviewed, revived, reinstated, implied, or deemed
conferred by operation of law or judicial construction.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (a), if any provision of
this Act is held invalid, no provision of this Act shall be
construed, severed, or applied to confer, recognize, revive,
reinstate, or imply any power of an artificial person to engage
in election activity or ballot-issue activity. If invalidation
of any provision would otherwise result in an artificial person
acquiring, retaining, reviving, or being deemed to possess any
power to engage in election activity or ballot-issue activity,
the grant, recognition, extension, or preservation of powers,
privileges, or capacities to the affected class of artificial
persons under the affected section, chapter, or statutory cross­
reference is inseverable from the invalid provision and shall
have no force or effect. The legislature would not have enacted
any grant, recognition, or preservation of artificial person
powers that includes any power to engage in election activity or
ballot-issue activity.
SECTION 26. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 46
iiiiniiiiiMiiimniH

Page 47
S.B. NO. --
C.D.2
SECTION 27. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2027.
2026-3515 SB2471 CD2 HMSO 47

S.B. NO.
”0’2
C.D. 2
APPROVED this 14th day of May ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B. No. 2471, S.D. 2, H.D. 2, C.D. 2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: May 8, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 2471, SD 2, HD 2, CD 2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 8, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives